Utah statutes.
17-3-9.   Division of taxes.
Whenever a new county shall be created under the provisions of this chapter
and the officers thereof shall have duly qualified the county treasurer of the
county from which territory has been taken to create such new county shall
furnish to the county treasurer of such new county a certified list of all
taxes collected by him for the preceding year upon the property located within
such portion of his county as has become a part of such new county, together
with the entire amount of such county, district school or other special taxes
by him collected for such preceding year, less the pro rata cost of assessing
and collecting the same and the entire cost of making said certified lists.
